Washington statutes.
RCW 35.45.150

Installment notes—Interest certificates.

In addition to the issuance of bonds and warrants in payment of the cost and expense of any local improvement, any city or town may also issue and sell installment notes payable out of the local improvement district fund. Such installment notes may be issued any time after the thirty day period allowed by law for the payment of assessments of any district without penalty or interest, and may bear any denomination or denominations, the aggregate of which shall represent the balance of the cost and expense of the local improvement district which is to be borne by the property owners therein.

Application of local improvement district funds for the reduction of the principal and interest amounts due on any notes herein provided to finance said improvement shall be made not less than once each year beginning with the issue date thereof. Appropriate notification of such application of funds shall be made by the city or town treasurer to the registered payees of said notes, except those notes owned by funds of the issuing municipality. Such notes may be registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030. If more than one local improvement installment note is issued for a single district, said notes shall be numbered consecutively. All notes issued shall bear on the face thereof: (1) The name of the payee; (2) the number of the local improvement district from whose funds the notes are payable; (3) the date of issue of each note; (4) the date on which the note, or the final installment thereon shall become due; (5) the rate or rates of interest, as provided by the city or town legislative authority, to be paid on the unpaid balance thereof, and; (6) such manual or facsimile signatures and attestations as are required by state statute or city charter to appear on the warrants of each issuing municipality.

The reverse side of each installment note issued pursuant to this section shall bear a tabular payment record which shall indicate at prescribed installment dates, the receipt of any local improvement district funds for the purpose of servicing the debt evidenced by said notes. Such receipts shall first be applied toward the interest due on the unpaid balance of the note, and any additional moneys shall thereafter apply as a reduction of the principal amount thereof. The tabular payment record shall, in addition to the above, show the unpaid principal balance due on each installment note, together with sufficient space opposite each transaction affecting said note for the manual signature of the city's or town's clerk, treasurer or other properly designated receiving officer of the municipality, or of any other registered payee presenting said note for such installment payments.

Whenever there are insufficient funds in a local improvement district to meet any payment of installment interest due on any note herein authorized, a noninterest-bearing defaulted installment interest certificate shall be issued by the city or town treasurer which shall consist of a written statement certifying the amount of such defaulted interest installment; the name of the payee of the note to whom the interest is due and the number of the local improvement district from whose funds the note and interest thereon is payable. Such certificates may be registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030. The certificate herein provided shall bear the manual signature of the city or town treasurer or his or her authorized agent. The defaulted installment interest certificate so issued shall be redeemed for the face amount thereof with any available funds in the local improvement guaranty fund.

Whenever at the date of maturity of any installment note issued pursuant to this section, there are insufficient funds in a local improvement district, due to delinquencies in the collection of assessments, to pay the final installment of the principal due thereon, the note shall be redeemed with any available funds in the local improvement guaranty fund for the amount of said final installment.

All certificates and notes issued pursuant to this section are to become subject to the same redemption privileges as apply to any local improvement district bonds and warrants now accorded the protection of the local improvement guaranty fund as provided in chapter 35.54 RCW, and whenever the certificates or notes issued as herein provided are redeemed by said local improvement guaranty fund, they shall be held therein as investments thereof in the same manner as prescribed for other defaulted local improvement district obligations.

Notwithstanding any other statutory provisions, local improvement installment notes authorized by this section which are within the protection of the local improvement guaranty fund law shall be considered legal investments for any available surplus funds of the issuing municipality which now or hereafter may be authorized to be invested in the city's or town's local improvement districts' bonds or warrants and shall be considered legal investments for all national and state banks, savings and loan institutions, and any and all other commercial banking or financial institutions to the same extent that the local improvement district bonds and any coupons issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter have been and are legal investments for such institutions. Any such local improvement installment notes may be transferred or sold by said city or town upon such terms or conditions and in such manner as the local governing body of said city or town may determine, or may be issued to another fund of the city or town: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the same shall not be sold at less than par plus accrued interest.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, such notes and certificates may be issued, and such notes may be sold, in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2084; 1983 c 167 s 44. Prior: 1981 c 323 s 4; 1981 c 156 s 2; prior: 1970 ex.s. c 93 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 37; 1965 c 7 s 35.45.150; prior: 1961 c 165 s 1.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 93: See note following RCW 39.60.050.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Investment of public funds in notes, debentures: RCW 39.60.050.